Tennessee, session 114, HB0975.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-8-153, is amended by deleting
subsection (d) and substituting instead the following:
(1) The legislative body of any county, including a county having a metropolitan
form of government, has the power to prescribe such lower speed limits as it may deem
appropriate on any road being maintained by the county and shall erect appropriate
signs and traffic signals.
(2) A county legislative body may delegate, by resolution of the body, the
authority to lower speed limits on roads described in this subsection (d) to the chief
administrative officer of the county highway department if the department employs an
engineer capable of completing engineering and traffic investigations and ensures the
completion of the same. For purposes of this subdivision (d)(2), "chief administrative
officer" has the same meaning as defined in § 54-7-103.
(3) Engineering and traffic investigations used to establish speed limits by
counties on roads maintained by the county must be made in accordance with
established traffic engineering practices and in a manner that conforms to the guidelines
in the manual on uniform traffic control devices (MUTCD), and within state supplemental
guidelines. The investigations must be documented, and documentation must be
maintained by the jurisdiction performing or sponsoring the investigation.
HB0975
003075
- 1 -

(4) Notwithstanding subdivision (d)(1), the board of commissioners has the
power prescribed in this section in a county that has a commission form of government.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 003075